Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.355

Interstate medical licensure compact.

(1) Information distributed to any Washington health profession board or commission by an interstate health professions licensure compact or member boards as described in RCW 18.71B.080(6) of the interstate medical licensure compact is exempt from disclosure under this chapter. This exemption does not prohibit the requestor from requesting these documents from the state of origin.

(2) This exemption does not pertain to any records created by Washington health profession boards or commissions from the documents described in subsection (1) of this section. Records created by Washington health profession boards or commissions from the documents described in subsection (1) of this section may be exempt under other sections of this chapter.

[ 2017 c 195 s 25.]